Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 1. Penalties upon Officers

§ 1931.
Presiding officer receiving illegal vote.

A presiding officer in a local, primary, or general election who knowingly receives and counts a vote from a person not a qualified voter or knowingly receives from a voter, at any one balloting for the same office, more than one vote shall be fined not more than $100.00 if the offense is committed in a local election and not more than $500.00 if in a primary or general election.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1932.
Counting ballots and opening ballot boxes before proper time.

A presiding officer at a primary or general election who allows the ballots for representative to the General Assembly, or State, county, or congressional officers to be counted or, except as provided in section 2499 of this title, the ballot box containing the same to be opened before the closing of the polls shall be fined not more than $200.00 nor less than $20.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 198

, § 4, eff. July 5, 1961;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1933.
Nonperformance of duty by public officer.

Except as otherwise provided by this title, a public officer upon whom a duty is imposed by the provisions of this title who willfully neglects to perform such duty or who willfully performs it in such a way as to hinder the object of the provisions of this title shall be fined not more than $500.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.